Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
FILING DOCUMENTS

§414-11 Filing requirements. (a) A
document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other
section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to filing by
the department director.

(b) This chapter must require or permit filing
the document in the office of the department director.

(c) The document must contain the information
required by this chapter. It may contain other information as well.

(d) The document must be typewritten or printed.

(e) The document must be in the English
language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English
letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of good standing
required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by an
English translation under oath of the translator.

(f) The document must be certified and
executed:

(1) By the chairperson of the board of directors of a
domestic or foreign corporation, by its president, or by another of its
officers;

(2) If directors have not been selected or the
corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

(3) If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver,
trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

(g) The person executing the document shall
sign it and print beneath or opposite that person's signature the person's name
and the capacity in which the person signs. The document may but need not
contain:

(1) The corporate seal;

(2) An attestation by the secretary or an assistant
secretary; or

(3) An acknowledgment, verification, or proof.

(h) If the department director has prescribed
a mandatory form for the document under section 414-12, the document must be in
or on the prescribed form.

(i) The document must be delivered to the office
of the department director for filing and must be accompanied by the correct
filing fee and any penalty required by this chapter. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1;
am L 2001, c 129, §§6 to 8]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next